Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Part 2

Issuance of Shares

48-16-201. Subscription for shares.

A subscription for shares entered into before incorporation shall be in writing, and any such subscription shall be irrevocable for six (6) months unless the subscription agreement provides a longer or shorter period or all the subscribers agree to revocation.

The board of directors may determine the payment terms of subscriptions for shares that were entered into before incorporation, unless the subscription agreement specifies them. A call for payment by the board of directors must be uniform so far as practicable as to all shares of the same class or series, unless the subscription agreement specifies otherwise.

Shares issued pursuant to subscriptions entered into before incorporation are fully paid and nonassessable when the corporation receives the consideration specified in the subscription agreement.

If a subscriber defaults in payment of money or property under a subscription agreement entered into before incorporation, the corporation may collect the amount owed as any other debt. Alternatively, unless the subscription agreement provides otherwise, the corporation may rescind the agreement and may sell the shares if the debt remains unpaid more than twenty (20) days after the corporation sends written demand for payment to the subscriber.

A subscription agreement entered into after incorporation shall be in writing and is a contract between the subscriber and the corporation subject to § 48-16-202.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 6.20.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), Nos. 5-1109, 5-1110.

48-16-202. Issuance of shares.

The powers granted in this section to the board of directors may be reserved to the shareholders by the charter.

The board of directors may authorize shares to be issued for consideration consisting of any tangible or intangible property or benefit to the corporation, including cash, promissory notes, services performed, contracts for services to be performed, or other benefits to be received, or other securities of the corporation.

Before the corporation issues shares, the board of directors shall determine that the consideration received or to be received for shares to be issued is adequate. A decision by the board of directors to accept consideration for shares shall be deemed a determination that the consideration is adequate. A determination by the board of directors is conclusive insofar as the adequacy of consideration for the issuance of shares relates to whether the shares are validly issued, fully paid, and nonassessable.

When the corporation receives the consideration for which the board of directors authorized the issuance of shares, the shares issued therefor are fully paid and nonassessable. For the purposes of this subsection (d), when and to the extent consideration for the issuance of shares consists of a promissory note or contract for services or other benefits, the corporation has received such consideration at the time such note is issued or contract is entered into.

The corporation may place in escrow shares issued for a contract for future services or benefits or a promissory note, or make other arrangements to restrict the transfer of the shares, and may credit distributions in respect of the shares against their purchase price, until the services are performed, the note is paid, or the benefits received. If the services are not performed, the note is not paid, or the benefits are not received, the shares escrowed or restricted and the distributions credited may be cancelled in whole or in part.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 6.21; 1994, ch. 776, §§ 14, 15.

Cross-References. Stocks held by fiduciary in nominee's name, § 35-3-118.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), Nos. 5-103, 5-1203.

48-16-203. Liability of shareholders.

A purchaser from a corporation of its own shares is not liable to the corporation or its creditors with respect to the shares except to pay the consideration for which the shares were authorized to be issued (§ 48-16-202) or specified in a preincorporation subscription agreement (§ 48-16-201).

A shareholder of a corporation is not personally liable for the acts or debts of the corporation except that the shareholder may become personally liable by reason of the shareholder's own acts or conduct.

Any person becoming an assignee or transferee of shares or of a subscription for shares in good faith and without knowledge or notice that the full consideration therefor has not been paid shall not be personally liable for any unpaid portion of such consideration, but the transferor shall remain liable therefor, whether such assignment or transfer be voluntary or involuntary.

No person holding shares in any corporation as collateral security shall be personally liable as a shareholder, but the person pledging such shares shall be considered the holder thereof and shall be so liable. No executor, administrator, guardian, trustee, or other fiduciary shall be personally liable as a shareholder, but the estate and funds in the hands of such executor, administrator, guardian, trustee, or other fiduciary shall be liable.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 6.22.

Law Reviews.

Vicarious Liability and the Traditional Law Firm Partnership: What You Should Know (Paul S. Davidson) 29 Tenn. B.J. 12 (1993).

48-16-204. Share dividends.

Unless the charter provides otherwise, shares may be issued pro rata and without consideration to the corporation's shareholders or to the shareholders of one (1) or more classes or series. An issuance of shares under this subsection (a) is a share dividend.

Shares of one (1) class or series may not be issued as a share dividend in respect of shares of another class or series unless:

The charter so authorizes;

A majority of the votes entitled to be cast by the class or series to be issued approves the issue; or

There are no outstanding shares of the class or series to be issued.

If the board of directors does not fix the record date for determining shareholders entitled to a share dividend, it is the date the board of directors authorizes the share dividend.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 6.23.

48-16-205. Options to subscribe for or purchase shares — Instruments evidencing options — Authority to grant.

Unless the charter otherwise provides, a corporation, by its directors, may grant rights, options or warrants to subscribe for or to purchase shares of any authorized class, at the times and on the terms that are set forth in such rights, options or warrants, or in the contracts, warrants or instruments that evidence such rights, options or warrants, which contracts, warrants or instruments may be transferable or nontransferable and may be separable or inseparable from such rights, options or warrants upon the following conditions:

If the shares are subject to preemptive rights and if the rights, options or warrants are not granted to shareholders in satisfaction of their preemptive rights, the granting of the rights, options or warrants must be authorized by the vote or consent of the shareholders or holders of shares of particular classes that then would be required to waive or release such preemptive rights; the vote or consent shall release the preemptive rights to the shares required to satisfy the rights, options or warrants if and when exercised; and

If at the time of granting the rights, options or warrants the corporation does not have authorized and unissued shares sufficient to satisfy the rights, options or warrants if and when exercised, the granting of the rights, options or warrants must be authorized by the vote of the shareholders or holders of shares of particular classes that then would be required to adopt an amendment to the charter for the purpose of increasing the authorized number of such shares, and the shares required to be issued upon the exercise of the rights, options or warrants shall be provided by an amendment concurrently or thereafter adopted by the shareholders or the directors.

The securities, contracts, warrants or instruments that evidence the rights, options or warrants may contain any terms not repugnant to law, including, but not limited to, the following:

Restrictions upon the authorization or issuance of additional shares;

Provisions for the adjustment of the exercise price;

Provisions concerning rights in the event of reorganization, merger, share exchange or sale of the entire assets of the corporation;

Provisions for the reservation of authorized but unissued shares to satisfy the rights, options or warrants;

Restrictions upon the declaration of payment of dividends or distributions; or

Conditions on the exercise of the rights, options or warrants, including, subject to the limitation specified in subdivision (b)(2), conditions that preclude a holder, including, but not limited to, a holder of at least a specified number or percentage of the outstanding common shares of the corporation, or a holder offering to purchase at least a specified number or percentage of the outstanding common shares of the corporation, from exercising the rights, options or warrants.

The express or implied authority conferred by subdivision (b)(1) or any other section of this chapter for securities, contracts, warrants, or instruments that evidence such rights, options or warrants to contain a condition on the exercise of such rights, options or warrants that precludes a holder, including, but not limited to, a holder of at least a specified number or percentage of the outstanding common shares of the corporation, or a holder offering to purchase at least a specified number or percentage of the outstanding common shares of the corporation, from exercising rights, options or warrants, shall apply only to:

A corporation that has issued and has outstanding shares listed on a national securities exchange or is regularly quoted in an over-the-counter market by one (1) or more members of a national or affiliated securities association; or

A corporation that has adopted a shareholder's agreement pursuant to which rights, options or warrants are granted, if the securities, contracts, warrants or instruments that evidence the rights, options or warrants contain a condition that precludes a holder, including, but not limited to, a holder of at least a specified number or percentage of the outstanding common shares of the corporation or a holder offering to purchase at least a specified number or percentage of the outstanding common shares of the corporation, from exercising the rights, options or warrants.

Subject to the conditions set forth in subsection (a), the board of directors may authorize one (1) or more officers to designate the recipients of rights, options, warrants or other equity compensation awards that involve the issuance of shares and determine, within an amount and subject to any other limitations established by the board and, if applicable, the stockholders, the number of such rights, options, warrants or other equity compensation awards and the terms thereof to be received by the recipients; provided, that no officer shall use such authority to designate either such officer or such other persons as the board of directors may specify as a recipient of such rights, options, warrants or other equity compensation awards.

As used in this section, “securities” includes obligations and shares of the corporation.

This section shall apply to any rights, options or warrants, or any contracts, warrants, or instruments that evidence such rights, options or warrants which were issued subsequent to January 1, 1985.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 6.24; 1989, ch. 451, § 7; 2012, ch. 1051, § 22.

48-16-206. Form and content of certificate.

Shares may but need not be represented by certificates. Unless chapters 11-27 of this title or another statute expressly provides otherwise, the rights and obligations of shareholders are identical whether or not their shares are represented by certificates.

At a minimum each share certificate must state on its face:

The name of the issuing corporation and that it is organized under the laws of this state;

The name of the person to whom issued; and

The number and class of shares and the designation of the series, if any, the certificate represents.

If the issuing corporation is authorized to issue different classes of shares or different series within a class, the designations, relative rights, preferences, and limitations applicable to each class and the variations in rights, preferences, and limitations determined for each series (and the authority of the board of directors to determine variations for future series) must be summarized on the front or back of each certificate. Alternatively, each certificate may state conspicuously on its front or back that the corporation will furnish the shareholder this information on request in writing and without charge.

Each share certificate:

Shall be signed (either manually or in facsimile) by two (2) officers designated in the bylaws or by the board of directors; and

May bear the corporate seal or its facsimile.

If the person who signed (either manually or in facsimile) a share certificate no longer holds office when the certificate is issued, the certificate is nevertheless valid.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 6.25.

48-16-207. Shares without certificates.

Unless the charter or bylaws provide otherwise, the board of directors of a corporation may authorize the issue of some or all of the shares of any or all of its classes or series without certificates. The authorization does not affect shares already represented by certificates until they are surrendered to the corporation.

Within a reasonable time after the issue or transfer of shares without certificates, the corporation shall send the shareholder a written statement of the information required on certificates by § 48-16-206(b) and (c), and, if applicable, § 48-16-208, except that no such written statement need be sent by a corporation in respect of shares that are not subject to any restriction on transfer described in § 48-16-208 and that are issued by a corporation subject to the reporting requirements of § 13 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (15 U.S.C. § 78m).

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 6.26.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 5-1103.

48-16-208. Restriction on transfer of shares and other securities.

The charter, bylaws, an agreement among shareholders, or an agreement between shareholders and the corporation may impose restrictions on the transfer or registration of transfer of shares of the corporation. A restriction does not affect shares issued before the restriction was adopted unless the holders of the shares are parties to the restriction agreement or voted in favor of the restriction.

A restriction on the transfer or registration of transfer of shares is valid and enforceable against the holder or a transferee of the holder if the restriction is authorized by this section and its existence is noted conspicuously on the front or back of the certificate or is contained in the information statement required by § 48-16-207(b). Unless so noted, a restriction is not enforceable against a person without knowledge of the restriction.

A restriction on the transfer or registration of transfer of shares is authorized:

To maintain the corporation's status when it is dependent on the number or identity of its shareholders;

To preserve exemptions under federal or state securities law; or

For any other reasonable purpose.

A restriction on the transfer or registration of transfer of shares may:

Obligate the shareholder first to offer the corporation or other persons (separately, consecutively, or simultaneously) an opportunity to acquire the restricted shares;

Obligate the corporation or other persons (separately, consecutively, or simultaneously) to acquire the restricted shares;

Require the corporation, the holders of any class of its shares, or another person to approve the transfer of the restricted shares, if the requirement is not manifestly unreasonable; or

Prohibit the transfer of the restricted shares to designated persons or classes of persons, if the prohibition is not manifestly unreasonable.

For purposes of this section, “shares” includes a security convertible into or carrying a right to subscribe for or acquire shares.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 6.27.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), Nos. 5-1101, 5-1102, 5-1110 — 5-1113.

Law Reviews.

Some Whys and Wherefores in Drafting Shareholder Agreements (Robert L. McMurray), 23 Tenn. B.J. 19 (1987).

48-16-209. Expense of issue.

A corporation may pay the expenses of selling or underwriting its shares, and of organizing or reorganizing the corporation, from the consideration received for shares.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 6.28.